Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 1 General Provisions

37-7-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Alcoholic” means a person who habitually lacks self-control as to the use of alcoholic beverages or who uses alcoholic beverages to the extent that his health is substantially impaired or endangered or his social or economic function is substantially
disrupted.

“Alcoholic beverages” means alcoholic spirits, liquors, wines, beers, and every liquid or fluid, patented or not, containing alcoholic spirits, wine, or beer or any other liquid or fluid containing alcohol in any form and producing intoxication in any
form or to any degree.

“Alcoholic, drug dependent individual, or drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment” means a person who is an inpatient or an outpatient.

(3.1)
“Available outpatient treatment” means outpatient treatment, either public or private, available in the patient’s community, including but not limited to supervision and support of the patient by family, friends,
or other responsible persons in that community. Outpatient treatment at state expense shall be available only within the limits of state funds specifically appropriated therefor.

“Chief medical officer” means the physician with overall responsibility for patient treatment at any facility receiving patients under this chapter or a physician appointed in writing as the designee of such chief medical officer.

“Clinical record” means a written record pertaining to an individual patient and shall include all medical records, progress notes, charts, admission and discharge data, and all other information which is recorded by a facility which pertains to the patient’s
hospitalization and treatment. Such other information as may be required by rules and regulations of the board shall also be included.

“Community mental health center” means an organized program for the care and treatment of alcoholics, drug dependent individuals, or drug abusers operated by a community service board or other appropriate public provider.

“Court” means:

In the case of an individual who is 17 years of age or older, the probate court for the county of residence of the patient or the county in which such patient is found. Notwithstanding Code Section 15-9-13, in any case in which the judge of the probate
court is unable to hear a case brought under this chapter within the time required for such hearing or is unavailable to issue the order specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-41, the judge shall appoint a person
to serve and exercise all the jurisdiction of the probate court in such case. Any person so appointed shall be a member of the State Bar of Georgia and be otherwise qualified for his duties by training and experience. Such
appointment may be made on a case-by-case basis or by making a standing appointment of one or more persons. Any person receiving such a standing appointment shall serve at the pleasure of the judge making the appointment
or his successor in office to hear such cases if and when necessary. The compensation of a person so appointed shall be as agreed upon by the judge who makes the appointment and the person appointed and as approved by the
governing authority of the county for which such person is appointed and shall be paid from the county funds of the county. All fees collected for the services of such appointed person shall be paid into the general funds
of the county served; or

In the case of an individual who is under the age of 17 years, the juvenile court of the county of residence of the patient or the county in which the patient is found.

“Drug dependent individual” or “drug abuser” means a person who habitually lacks self-control as to the use of opium, heroin, morphine, or any derivative or synthetic drug of that group, barbiturates, other sedatives, tranquilizers, amphetamines, lysergic
acid diethylamide or other hallucinogens, or any drug, dangerous drug, narcotic drug, marijuana, or controlled substance, as defined in Article 2 or Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 16 or Chapter 3 of Title 26; or a person who
uses such drugs to the extent that his health is substantially impaired or endangered or his social or economic function is substantially disrupted; provided, however, that no person shall be deemed a drug dependent individual
or abuser solely by virtue of his taking, according to directions, any such drugs pursuant to a lawful prescription issued by a physician in the course of professional treatment for legitimate medical purposes.

“Emergency receiving facility” means a facility designated by the department to receive patients under emergency conditions as provided in Part 1 of Article 3 of this chapter.

“Evaluating facility” means a facility designated by the department to receive patients for evaluation as provided in Part 2 of Article 3 of this chapter.

“Facility” means any state owned or state operated hospital, community mental health center, or other facility utilized for the diagnosis, care, treatment, or hospitalization of persons who are alcoholics, drug dependent individuals, or drug abusers and
any other hospital or facility within the State of Georgia approved for such purpose by the department.

“Full and fair hearing” or “hearing” means a proceeding before a hearing examiner under Code Section 37-7-83 or Code Section 37-7-93 or before a court as defined in paragraph (7) of this Code section. The hearing may be held in a regular courtroom or
in an informal setting, in the discretion of the hearing examiner or the court, but the hearing shall be recorded electronically or by a qualified court reporter. The patient shall be provided with effective assistance of counsel.
If the patient cannot afford counsel, the court shall appoint counsel for him or the hearing examiner shall have the court appoint such counsel; provided, however, that the patient shall have the right to refuse in writing the
appointment of counsel, in the discretion of the hearing examiner or the court. The patient shall have the right to confront and cross-examine witnesses and to offer evidence. The patient shall have the right to subpoena witnesses
and to require testimony before the hearing examiner or in court in person or by deposition from any physician upon whose evaluation the decision of the hearing examiner or the court may rest. The patient shall have the right to
obtain a continuance for any reasonable time for good cause shown. The hearing examiner and the court shall apply the rules of evidence applicable in civil cases. The burden of proof shall be upon the party seeking treatment of
the patient. The standard of proof shall be by clear and convincing evidence. At the request of the patient, the public may be excluded from the hearing. The patient may waive his right to be present at the hearing, in the discretion
of the hearing examiner or the court. The reason for the action of the court or hearing examiner in excluding the public or permitting the hearing to proceed in the patient’s absence shall be reflected in the record.

“Incapacitated by alcohol or drugs” means that a person, as a result of the use of alcoholic beverages, any drug, or any other substances listed in paragraph (8) of this Code section, exhibits life-threatening levels of intoxication, withdrawal, or imminent
danger thereof, or acute medical problems; or is under the influence of alcoholic beverages or drugs or any other substances listed in paragraph (8) of this Code section to the extent that the person is incapable of caring for
himself or protecting himself due to the continued consumption or use thereof.

“Individualized treatment plan” means a proposal developed during a patient’s stay in a facility and which is specifically tailored to the individual patient’s treatment needs. Each plan shall clearly include the following:

A statement of treatment goals or objectives based upon and related to a proper evaluation, which can be reasonably achieved within a designated time interval;

Treatment methods and procedures to be used to obtain these goals, which methods and procedures are related to these goals and which include a specific prognosis for achieving these goals;

Identification of the types of professional personnel who will carry out the treatment and procedures, including appropriate medical or other professional involvement by a physician or other health professional properly qualified to fulfill legal requirements
mandated under state and federal law;

Documentation of patient involvement and, if applicable, the patient’s accordance with the treatment plan; and

A statement attesting that the chief medical officer has made a reasonable effort to meet the plan’s individualized treatment goals in the least restrictive environment possible closest to the patient’s home community.

Who presents a substantial risk of imminent harm to that person or others, as manifested by either recent overt acts or recent expressed threats of violence which present a probability of physical injury to that person or other persons; or

Who is incapacitated by alcoholic beverages, drugs, or any other substances listed in paragraph (8) of this Code section on a recurring basis; and

Who is in need of involuntary inpatient treatment.

(14.1)
“Inpatient” means a person who is an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser and:

(14.2)
“Inpatient treatment” or “hospitalization” means a program of treatment for alcoholics, drug dependent individuals, or drug abusers within a hospital facility setting.

(14.3)
“Involuntary treatment” means inpatient or outpatient treatment which a patient is required to obtain pursuant to this chapter.

“Least restrictive alternative,” “least restrictive alternative placement,” “least restrictive environment,” or “least restrictive appropriate care and treatment” means that which is the least restrictive available alternative, placement, environment,
or care and treatment, respectively, within the limits of state funds specifically appropriated therefor.

(15.1)
“Outpatient” means a person who is an alcoholic, drug dependent individual, or drug abuser and:

(15.2)
“Outpatient treatment” means a program of treatment for alcoholics, drug dependent individuals, or drug abusers outside a hospital facility setting which includes, without being limited to, medication and prescription
monitoring, individual or group therapy, day or partial programming activities, case management services, and other services to alleviate or treat the patient’s lack of self-control regarding the use of alcoholic beverages,
drugs, or any other substances listed in paragraph (8) of this Code section so as to maintain the patient’s semi-independent functioning and to prevent the patient’s becoming an inpatient.

Who is capable of surviving safely in the community with available resources or supervision from family, friends, or others;

Who, based on their mental condition or behavioral history, is in need of treatment in order to prevent further disability or deterioration that would predictably result in dangerousness to self or others; and

Whose current mental status or the nature of their addictive disease limits or negates their ability to make an informed decision to seek voluntarily or to comply with recommended treatment.

“Patient” means any alcoholic, drug dependent individual, or drug abuser who seeks treatment under this chapter or any person for whom such treatment is sought.

“Private facility” means any hospital facility that is a proprietary hospital or a hospital operated by a nonprofit corporation or association approved for the purposes of this chapter and a hospital facility operated by a hospital authority created pursuant
to Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31.

(17.1)
“Psychologist” means a licensed psychologist who meets the criteria of training and experience as a health service provider psychologist as provided in Code Section 31-7-162.

(17.2)
“Regional state hospital administrator” means the chief administrative officer of a state owned or state operated hospital and the state owned or operated community programs in a region. The regional state hospital
administrator has overall management responsibility for the regional state hospital and manages services provided by employees of the regional state hospital and employees of state owned or operated community programs within
a mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases region established in accordance with Code Section 37-2-3.

“Representatives” means the persons appointed as provided in Code Section 37-7-147 to receive notice of the proceedings for voluntary or involuntary treatment.

“Superintendent” means the chief administrative officer who has overall management responsibility at any facility, other than a regional state hospital or state owned or operated community program, receiving patients under this chapter or an individual
appointed as the designee of such superintendent.

“Treatment” means the broad range of emergency, outpatient, intermediate, and inpatient services and care, including diagnostic evaluation, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation, and career counseling,
which may be extended to alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug dependent individuals, and drug abusers.

“Treatment facility” means a facility designated by the department to receive patients for treatment as provided in Part 3 of Article 3 of this chapter.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-401, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 744, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 28; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 6; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 27; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 37; Ga.
L. 1992, p. 1902, § 15; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 17.7; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-15; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-19/HB 228; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-5/HB 1013.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subparagraphs (15.1)(A) through (15.1)(C), which read: “(A) Who is not an inpatient but who, based on the person's treatment history or recurrent lack of self-control regarding the use of
alcoholic beverages, drugs, or any other substances listed in paragraph (8) of this Code section, will require outpatient treatment in order to avoid predictably and imminently becoming an inpatient;

“(B) Who because of the person's current mental state and recurrent lack of self-control regarding the use of alcoholic beverages, drugs, or any other substances listed in paragraph (8) of this Code section or nature of the person's alcoholic behavior
or drug dependency or drug abuse is unable voluntarily to seek or comply with outpatient treatment; and

“(C) Who is in need of involuntary treatment.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, the second “alcoholic” was substituted for “alcholic” in paragraph (13).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Law reviews.

For comment on City of Macon v. Southern Bell Tel. & Tel. Co.,

89 Ga. App. 252
,

79 S.E.2d 265
(1953), see 17 Ga. B.J. 117 (1954).

For comment on Burger v. State,

118 Ga. App. 328
,

163 S.E.2d 333
(1968), see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 384 (1969).

For comment, “1986 Amendments to Georgia’s Mental Health Statutes: The Latest Attempt to Provide a Solution to the Problem of the Chronically Mentally Ill,” see 36 Emory L.J. 1313 (1987).

For annual survey of law on labor and employment law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 181 (2010).

37-7-2.
Authority of board to issue regulations; powers of department generally.

The board shall issue regulations to implement this chapter in accordance with the intent of this chapter to safeguard the rights of alcoholics, drug dependent individuals, or drug abusers, as set forth in Code Sections 37-7-100, 37-7-101, and 37-7-120,
and Article 6 of this chapter.

(a.1)
The board shall issue regulations to implement the provisions of Code Section 40-5-63.1 relative to clinical evaluations and substance abuse treatment programs and shall prescribe such application fees for providers
desiring authorization to provide clinical evaluations or substance abuse treatment programs as are reasonably necessary to cover the cost of considering such applications. Such regulations shall provide for approval of providers
and such approval shall be valid continuously unless and until revoked in accordance with such regulations.

In addition to the other powers provided by this chapter, the department shall have the authority:

To enforce the regulations issued by the board;

To prescribe the forms of applications, records, medical certificates, and any other forms required or used under this chapter and the information required to be contained therein;

To require such reports from any facility as it may find necessary to the performance of its duties or functions;

To visit facilities regularly to review the hospitalization procedures applied to all patients;

To determine the care and treatment being given all patients;

To develop criteria for providing priority in access to services and admissions to programs for drug or alcohol dependent pregnant females;

To investigate complaints and make reports and recommendations relative thereto; and

To make effective such procedures and orders as may be appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Notwithstanding the powers granted to the department under this Code section, the requirements of this Code section as to determination of treatment and care of patients and the investigation of complaints shall not apply to patients hospitalized in an
institution operated by or under the control of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-406.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-407.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 977, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 760, § 6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 760, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Teenage and Adult Driver Responsibility Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 203 (1997).

37-7-3.
Coordination of state drug and alcohol abuse programs.

All programs conducted by state agencies with respect to drug and alcohol abuse, except the regulation of the sale or dispensation of drugs and related products by the Board of Pharmacy pursuant to Georgia laws and the investigation of criminal conduct
pertaining to illegal drugs transferred to the Department of Public Safety shall be coordinated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities; provided, however, that any other state agency is not precluded
or prohibited from conducting an educational program relating to drug or alcohol abuse.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 37/HB 1387.

37-7-4.
Validity of hospitalization orders entered before September 1, 1978; establishment of regulations authorizing continued hospitalization of patients hospitalized before September 1, 1978.

No hospitalization of an alcoholic, drug dependent individual, or drug abuser lawful before September 1, 1978, shall be deemed unlawful because of the enactment of this chapter. The board is authorized to establish reasonable regulations to require that
the chief medical officer of each treatment facility apply under Code Section 37-7-83 for an order authorizing continued hospitalization of any patient for whom such hospitalization is necessary and who was initially hospitalized under
an order of a court prior to September 1, 1978. Such prior orders of hospitalization entered by the courts, unless superseded at an earlier date by an order under this chapter or unless such prior orders expire under their own terms
at an earlier date, shall remain valid until March 1, 1979, after which all such orders shall be null and void and of no effect.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-407.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

37-7-5.
Immunity from liability for actions taken in good faith compliance with admission and discharge provisions of chapter.

Any physician, psychologist, peace officer, attorney, or health official, or any hospital official, agent, or other person employed by a private hospital or at a facility operated by the state, by a political subdivision of the state, or by a hospital
authority created pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31, who acts in good faith in compliance with the transport, admission, and discharge provisions of this chapter shall be immune from civil or criminal liability for his
actions in connection with the transport of a patient to a physician or facility, the admission of a patient to a facility, or the discharge of a patient from a facility. The immunity from civil liability provided in this Code section
in connection with the transport of a patient to a physician or a facility shall apply only to injury or damages incurred by such patient or his or her personal representative.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.23, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 996, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 722, § 4/SB 403.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, substituted “transport, admission, and discharge” for “admission and discharge”, substituted “the transport of a patient to a physician or facility, the admission of a patient to a facility, or the
discharge” for “the admission of a patient to a facility or the discharge”, and added the second sentence.

Cross references.

Liability of law enforcement officers for actions taken at scene of emergency, §

35-1-7

.

Employment and training of peace officers, T. 35, C. 8.

Physicians generally, T. 43, C. 34.

Psychologists generally, T. 43, C. 39.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 722, § 1/SB 403, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Behavioral Health and Peace Officer Co-Responder Act.’”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 722, § 2/SB 403, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Demands on peace officers include responding to emergencies involving individuals with a mental or emotional illness, developmental disability, or addictive disease, without the benefit of a behavioral health specialist being present;

“(2) The presence of a behavioral health specialist exponentially decreases the risk of escalation;

“(3) The absence of a behavioral health specialist may result in the arrest of individuals whose conduct would be more effectively treated and stabilized in a behavioral health setting rather than a jail or prison;

“(4) Law enforcement agencies throughout Georgia frequently report that jails and prisons are becoming revolving door behavioral health hospitals of last resort;

“(5) Several law enforcement agencies in Georgia have established co-responder programs and formed co-responder partnerships with local community service boards. Community service boards provide support during emergency responses and provide follow-up
services to help stabilize the individual in crisis and prevent relapse;

“(6) Combining the expertise of peace officers and behavioral health specialists to de-escalate behavioral health crises prevents unnecessary incarceration of individuals with a mental or emotional illness, developmental disability, or addictive disease
and instead links those in crisis to services that promote stability and reduce the likelihood of recurrence, decreases the costs incurred by prisons and jails to incarcerate such individuals, and increases the ability of peace officers
outside of the co-responder teams to focus on serious crimes; and

“(7) It is in the best interest of the state to establish the framework for a state-wide co-responder model to include emergency response co-responder teams and post-emergency behavioral health services.”

37-7-6.
Apprehension by peace officer of patient who leaves facility without permission.

If, during the period of involuntary hospitalization pursuant to any valid physician’s certificate, court order, or order by the hearing examiner authorized by this chapter, a patient escapes or otherwise leaves a facility without permission, the facility
may advise any peace officer that the patient has escaped or otherwise left the facility without permission; and the peace officer shall be authorized to take such patient into custody and return him to such facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-407.9, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 744, § 11.

37-7-7.
Approval of private facilities as emergency receiving facilities, evaluating facilities, or treatment facilities; powers and duties of private facilities; right to deny admission.

Any private facility within this state may be approved as an emergency receiving facility, an evaluating facility, or a treatment facility by the department at the request of or with the consent of the governing officers of such private facility. When
so approved, the private facility shall have all powers given to the corresponding type of state owned or state operated facility under the provisions of this chapter on voluntary admission, emergency admission, admission for evaluation,
and involuntary hospitalization and shall have all duties and obligations of such facilities imposed by this chapter, except that any such private facility may decline to accept any patient who is unable to pay it for hospitalization
or for whom it has no available space.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-407.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

37-7-8.
“Drug” defined; Right of minor to obtain treatment of drug abuse on minor’s consent alone; binding effect of consent; informing minor’s parent, spouse, custodian, or guardian of treatment.

As used in this Code section, the term “drug” means any drug as defined in Code Section 26-3-2, any dangerous drug as defined in Code Section 16-13-71, any controlled substance as defined in Code Section 16-13-21, and any narcotic drug as defined in Code
Section 16-13-21.

The consent to the provision of medical or surgical care or services by a hospital or public clinic or to the performance of medical or surgical care or services by a physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, when such consent is given by a
minor who is or professes to be suffering from drug abuse, shall be as valid and binding as if the minor had achieved his majority, provided that any such treatment shall involve procedures and therapy related to conditions or
illnesses arising out of the drug abuse which gave rise to the consent authorized under this Code section. Any such consent shall not be subject to later disaffirmance by reason of minority. The consent of no other person or persons,
including but not limited to a spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian, shall be necessary in order to authorize the provision to such minor of such medical or surgical care or services as are described in this subsection.

Upon the advice and direction of a treating physician or, if more than one, of any one of them, a member of the medical staff of a hospital or public clinic or a physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery may, but shall not be obligated to, inform
the spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian of any such minor as to the treatment given or needed. Such information may be given to or withheld from the spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian without the consent of the minor patient
and even over the express refusal of the minor patient to the providing of such information.

History.
Ga. L. 1971, p. 337, §§ 1-3.

Cross references.

Giving of consent for surgical or medical treatment generally, T. 31, C. 9.

Right of minor to obtain medical, surgical, or other treatment for venereal disease on minor’s consent alone, § 31-17-7.